Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1316
Retirement system; sue and be sued; actions; representation by Attorney General.

The retirement system may sue or be sued in the name of the system, and in all actions brought by or against it, the system shall be represented by the Attorney General.

Laws 1963, c. 532, § 16, p. 1673;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 46.